Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2976
Indemnification.

Indemnification
of any individual who has incurred liability, is a party, or is threatened
to be made a party because of the performance of duties to, or activity on
behalf of, the limited cooperative association is governed by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 76;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 276.
January 1, 2017
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.